utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3967 Y 1
SFX 3967 0 ниран .
SFX 2627 Y 1
SFX 2627 0 граф .
SFX 1179 Y 1
SFX 1179 0 ичност .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 равме .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 ејуваат .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 лена .
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 0 лени .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 0 лено .
SFX 4435 Y 1
SFX 4435 0 тански .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 лката .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 шното .
SFX 3718 Y 1
SFX 3718 0 шевте .
SFX 1292 Y 1
SFX 1292 0 руваат .
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 0 тувањево .
SFX 3453 Y 1
SFX 3453 0 сениов .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 аат .
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 0 зеа .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 сенион .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 зев .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 0 зел .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 зен .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 иња .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 чав .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 чам .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 елот .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 шувајќи .
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 0 жноно .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 ела .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 еле .
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 0 ели .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 ело .
SFX 2412 Y 1
SFX 2412 0 авана .
SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 0 иха .
SFX 3733 Y 1
SFX 3733 0 карка .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 чињана .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 тирањено .
SFX 4216 Y 1
SFX 4216 0 џиска .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 џиски .
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 0 љубец .
SFX 4566 Y 1
SFX 4566 0 цето .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 екуваат .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 увавме .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 есна .
SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 0 есни .
SFX 2997 Y 1
SFX 2997 0 есно .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 шувани .
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 0 лните .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 0 чивме .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 изирањево .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 неме .
SFX 4697 Y 1
SFX 4697 0 суваново .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 одот .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 ичково .
SFX 2036 Y 1
SFX 2036 0 ечат .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 мент .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 чкиов .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 чкион .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 сот .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 0 вте .
SFX 4083 Y 1
SFX 4083 0 ига .
SFX 3915 Y 1
SFX 3915 0 пирање .
SFX 3213 Y 1
SFX 3213 0 ничкиве .
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 0 вајќи .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 нгот .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 0 лизирање .
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 0 тичното .
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 0 ечеме .
SFX 1250 Y 1
SFX 1250 0 орите .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 буваат .
SFX 3090 Y 1
SFX 3090 0 вениов .
SFX 3089 Y 1
SFX 3089 0 венион .
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 0 глав .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 арче .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 шела .
SFX 3763 Y 1
SFX 3763 0 шеле .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 шело .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 0 илниот .
SFX 3741 Y 1
SFX 3741 0 еевме .
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 0 орат .
SFX 2301 Y 1
SFX 2301 0 авите .
SFX 1906 Y 1
SFX 1906 0 очен .
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 0 паат .
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 0 жење .
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 0 жуваат .
SFX 3485 Y 1
SFX 3485 0 ациски .
SFX 1959 Y 1
SFX 1959 0 вниве .
SFX 4731 Y 1
SFX 4731 0 екувајќи .
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 0 ливоно .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 рата .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 0 пела .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 рате .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 пеле .
SFX 4022 Y 1
SFX 4022 0 рати .
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 0 пело .
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 0 кнеа .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 кнев .
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 0 кнел .
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 0 луваат .
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 0 ма .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 ме .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 ваа .
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 0 вав .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 ми .
SFX 1536 Y 1
SFX 1536 0 мо .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 вал .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 вам .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 0 ван .
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 0 дувана .
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 0 дувани .
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 0 дувано .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 тната .
SFX 1939 Y 1
SFX 1939 0 вноста .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 нувањето .
SFX 4467 Y 1
SFX 4467 0 ековме .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 алниве .
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 0 реност .
SFX 3793 Y 1
SFX 3793 0 зата .
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 0 гра .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 анана .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 ираниов .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 иранион .
SFX 2375 Y 1
SFX 2375 0 ителка .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 изираното .
SFX 3037 Y 1
SFX 3037 0 дувањана .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 0 ареа .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 арев .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 арен .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 арница .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 0 арници .
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 0 ирања .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 ирање .
SFX 2848 Y 1
SFX 2848 0 алија .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 мери .
SFX 1479 Y 1
SFX 1479 0 ништво .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 чиште .
SFX 3676 Y 1
SFX 3676 0 радува .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 0 лест .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 ена .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 ени .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 ено .
SFX 3042 Y 1
SFX 3042 0 овитост .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 иче .
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 0 ичи .
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 0 рниве .
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 0 нееја .
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 0 ивка .
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 0 тичарка .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 вањето .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 темина .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 ницине .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 мов .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 мон .
SFX 3760 Y 1
SFX 3760 0 јник .
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 0 лар .
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 0 лат .
SFX 4081 Y 1
SFX 4081 0 лај .
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 0 ител .
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 0 итен .
SFX 4864 Y 1
SFX 4864 0 анчиња .
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 0 измот .
SFX 4443 Y 1
SFX 4443 0 очната .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 естиот .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 увајќи .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 чуванана .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 шново .
SFX 4907 Y 1
SFX 4907 0 нејте .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 вница .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 вници .
SFX 2144 Y 1
SFX 2144 0 теше .
SFX 3143 Y 1
SFX 3143 0 вичка .
SFX 2764 Y 1
SFX 2764 0 чувањата .
SFX 4729 Y 1
SFX 4729 0 жуванана .
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 0 увачи .
SFX 3396 Y 1
SFX 3396 0 пувањана .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 иев .
SFX 1686 Y 1
SFX 1686 0 иел .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 иен .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 увањето .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 жувањата .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 циски .
SFX 4867 Y 1
SFX 4867 0 алница .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 0 јќи .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 тчиња .
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 0 саат .
SFX 1635 Y 1
SFX 1635 0 арува .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 ивиот .
SFX 3557 Y 1
SFX 3557 0 урка .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 иваме .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 шено .
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 пувајте .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 0 лниве .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 нта .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 нти .
SFX 1082 Y 1
SFX 1082 0 ковиќ .
SFX 4242 Y 1
SFX 4242 0 кција .
SFX 3257 Y 1
SFX 3257 0 исконо .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 дувавте .
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 0 анци .
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 0 азува .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 часовен .
SFX 3867 Y 1
SFX 3867 0 ствување .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 еејќи .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 0 ачката .
SFX 4178 Y 1
SFX 4178 0 оносен .
SFX 4299 Y 1
SFX 4299 0 ичав .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 пена .
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 0 пени .
SFX 4027 Y 1
SFX 4027 0 пено .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 ичару .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 шанана .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 суваме .
SFX 3239 Y 1
SFX 3239 0 сувате .
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 0 нсконо .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 рница .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 0 рници .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 0 оа .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ов .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 0 ог .
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 0 од .
SFX 1654 Y 1
SFX 1654 0 ои .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ок .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 ол .
SFX 2057 Y 1
SFX 2057 0 ом .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 он .
SFX 3701 Y 1
SFX 3701 0 вскиот .
SFX 2443 Y 1
SFX 2443 0 рувањето .
SFX 4056 Y 1
SFX 4056 0 бине .
SFX 4755 Y 1
SFX 4755 0 родниот .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 ричка .
SFX 3696 Y 1
SFX 3696 0 ечката .
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 0 овидниот .
SFX 4823 Y 1
SFX 4823 0 ладува .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 ливост .
SFX 3854 Y 1
SFX 3854 0 чуваните .
SFX 1176 Y 1
SFX 1176 0 тор .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 тот .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 рс .
SFX 2440 Y 1
SFX 2440 0 рт .
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 0 ру .
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 0 овниов .
SFX 3680 Y 1
SFX 3680 0 овнион .
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 0 ориве .
SFX 4170 Y 1
SFX 4170 0 тирала .
SFX 3907 Y 1
SFX 3907 0 тирале .
SFX 4804 Y 1
SFX 4804 0 тирало .
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 0 жуваните .
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 0 џиев .
SFX 1011 Y 1
SFX 1011 0 стиот .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 наа .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 нав .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 0 нак .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 нал .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 нам .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 мете .
SFX 3752 Y 1
SFX 3752 0 авиве .
