utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
отс/11,25,107,161,710,798,870,930,970,1021,1085,1086,1090,1091,1106,1110,1129,1134,1147,1435,1503,1809,1816,1836,1896,1953,2167,2403,2423,2427,2431,2825,2919,3133,3276,3345,3658,3766,3795,3955,3998,4118,4231,4317,4318,4351,4392,4416,4567,4569,4621,4622,4971
сос/2,6,7,14,20,25,81,89,158,232,311,314,315,360,538,670,750,917,921,926,951,1288,1304,1436,1553,1813,1835,1859,1917,1973,2013,2036,2184,2234,2296,2318,2319,2361,2495,2496,2497,2540,2649,2663,3608,4074,4535,4615
диз/3,7,14,35,81,87,88,95,102,218,266,538,917,921,926,951,1561,1611,1952,2732
зул/3,7,80,89,107,108,116,159,197,390,589,747,785,1200,1333,1924,2432,4649
неч/9,14,80,81,87,88,93,107,108,156,288,290,350,351,359,397,460,486,649,1004,1294,2037,2156,2997,3171,4046,4300,4463,4841
пати/1799,2283,2374,3967
вклу/194,573,1344,1357,1582,1670,1730,1780,1781,1790
изда/22,31,32,33,54,61,79,86,203,222,308,443,514,548,613,641,655,683,689,846,1092,1197,1228,1256,1260,1292,1376,1423,1440,1555,1578,1597,1612,1627,1646,1678,1688,1707,1708,1748,1770,1771,1772,1773,1774,1775,1776,1777,1788,1837,2168,3026,3201,3522,3760,4078,4180,4492,4547,4570,4626,4652
тром/23,38,42,43,44,45,69,91,162,949,1098,1102,1550,1862,2301,2412,2431,2651,2850,3751,3752,4263,4938
загр/233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,322,383,522,643,810,916,940,1086,1203,1329,1374,1540,1745,1816,1991,2231,2601,2615,3002,3372,3798,3827,3832,3842,3998,4596,4645,4981,4982
прел/359,620,1086,1129,1343,1525,1533,1546,1814,1933,2057,2156,2157,2438,2526,2642,2997,3171,3177,3536,3740,3788,3798,3832,4300,4539,4656,4779,4990
вија/4088
жужа/468,1050,1406,1909
пара/635,699,708,890,1142,1360,1587,1684,1745,2080,2177,2252,2266,2404,2418,2627,2727,2728,2752,2999,3700,3839,4469
вери/772,872,1291,1316,1547,1994,2248,2628,2715,2754,3132,3529,3805,3977,3978,3979,3980,3981,3982,3983,3984,4055,4653
повр/79,430,465,482,654,739,760,795,846,894,1280,1376,1447,1495,1622,1630,1646,1647,1952,1993,2175,2258,2526,3018,3170,3609,3790,3791,3792,3975,3976,4041,4880,4989
меди/81,88,106,154,164,865,1359,1374,1396,1539,1595,1924,2346,2782,2907,3112,3113,3194,3558,3674,3906,3907,4168,4170,4222,4394,4395,4396,4434,4503,4689,4690,4691,4692,4693,4751,4804,4881,4882
брек/90,179,180,316,323,345,453,471,472
приб/97,140,269,359,378,452,454,509,533,538,550,568,610,629,646,664,697,723,741,775,803,808,838,949,1004,1229,1404,1525,1686,1834,2031,2033,2041,2340,2360,2623,2626,2805,2845,3048,3145,3244,3266,3303,3304,3305,3306,3307,3308,3343,3344,3347,3633,3634,3661,3812,3966,3986,4047,4048,4061
среди/1280,1630,1646,1647,1661,1892,4272,4497
конци/1346
канти/1499,2315
самар/156,805,878,1217,1891,2303,2781,3199,3553,4216
прега/1993,2175,3018,3790,3791,3792,3975,3976
одлив/2,3,6,14,20,21,26,28,50,83,85,89,158,166,181,478
прочу/7,19,22,31,32,33,54,59,61,70,80,102,143,152,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,414,430,457,565,678,1020,1854,2638,2744
демир/7,80,81,87,88,90,95,102,107,108,121,131,154,164,265,528,609,739,776,785
араба/878,1217,4216,4489
мастер/1089
сребро/11,1559,2252,2499,3017,3891,4490,4877
заболе/1380,2993,3733
застра/176,190,191,251,322,605,736,871,1648,2325,2510,2640,3718,3719,3762,3763,3764
милост/179,703,719
поскап/2,3,7,9,13,21,23,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,94,101,111,161,163,173,199,228,261
тужите/2593
допрат/3,13,21,70,80,93,94,102,106,143,152,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,197,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,269,300,311,338,389,410,3843
инвест/352,805,4031
кравар/4083
маслен/91,98,148,543,557,2226,2305,4566
наполи/98,4435
неволни/14,15,17,20,85,92,98,100,658,1108,1253,1755,2506,3592,3903
потскок/2,15,35,112,987,1023
светкав/530,779,1015,1179,1567,4299
растовар/2,3,13,21,70,80,93,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,158,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,181,184,188,196,197,199,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,269,282,283,300,311,338,389,410,565,1093
феномена/305,419,481,495,524,713,714,909,1368,1609,2295,2466,3383
